Iowa, session 2025-2026, HF734.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 4 TLSB 2572YH (2) 91 jda/jh H.F. 734 Section 1. Section 256.11, subsection 5, paragraph b, Code 1 2025, is amended to read as follows: 2 b. (1) Five units of the social studies including 3 instruction in voting statutes and procedures, voter 4 registration requirements, the use of paper ballots and voting 5 systems in the election process, and the method of acquiring 6 and casting an absentee ballot. All students shall complete a 7 minimum of one-half one unit of United States government and 8 one unit of United States history. 9 (2) The one-half one unit of United States government shall 10 include the all of the following: 11 (a) The voting procedure as described in this lettered 12 paragraph and section 280.9A . The government instruction shall 13 also include a 14 (b) A study of the Constitution of the United States and the 15 Bill of Rights contained in the Constitution and an assessment 16 of a studentâs knowledge of the Constitution and the Bill of 17 Rights. 18 (c) Instruction related to civics. 19 Sec. 2. Section 256E.7, subsection 2, paragraph g, Code 20 2025, is amended by adding the following new subparagraph: 21 NEW SUBPARAGRAPH . (02) The educational standards 22 established in section 256.11, subsection 5, paragraph âbâ , 23 related to United States government instruction. 24 Sec. 3. Section 256F.4, subsection 2, Code 2025, is amended 25 by adding the following new paragraph: 26 NEW PARAGRAPH . 0q. Be subject to and comply with the 27 requirements of section 256.11, subsection 5, paragraph âbâ , 28 relating to United States government instruction in the same 29 manner as a school district. 30